District of Columbia statutes.
8-507

Investigations.

It shall be the duty of the Director of the Department of Human Services of the District of Columbia, whenever he has reason to believe that any provision of this chapter is being or has been violated, to cause an investigation to be made. For the purpose of such investigation the Director of the Department of Human Services, or any of his assistants designated by him in writing, shall have authority at all times during the ordinary business hours to enter any building or other place in the District of Columbia where mattresses are manufactured, renovated, or held for sale, exchange, or gift, or delivery in pursuance thereof. No person shall refuse or obstruct such inspection. Evidence obtained by the Director of the Department of Human Services or his assistants of any violations of this chapter shall be furnished the Corporation Counsel.

History

July 3, 1926, 44 Stat. 839, ch. 768, § 7
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-505.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-807.
1973 Ed., § 6-607.